Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska2-2703
Tractor model test results; board; duties.

After a tractor model has been duly tested by the University of Nebraska or by any Organization for Economic Cooperation and Development test station, the board shall submit the results of such test to the department. Prior to the issuance of a permanent sales permit by the department to any person for the sale of a tractor model, the board shall compare the test results with the manufacturer's representations as to power, fuel, and other ratings of the tractor model. If any such representations are found to be false, the board shall recommend that the department deny a permit for the sale of such tractor model. Any representation which a person makes with regard to the performance of its tractor at other than the customarily used power outlets shall be subject to test at the option of the board.

Laws 1963, c. 425, art. III, § 38, p. 1395;

R.R.S.1943, § 75-338;

Laws 1967, c. 480, § 3, p. 1487;

Laws 1971, LB 692, § 3;

Laws 1986, LB 768, § 5.